Vermont, session 2025-2026, H235.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 1338a is amended to read:
§ 1338a. DISREGARDED EARNINGS
(a) An individual shall be deemed “partially unemployed” in any week of
less than full-time work if the wages earned by the individual with respect to
such the week are less than the weekly benefit amount the individual would be
VT LEG #380116 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.235
2025 Page 2 of 4
entitled to receive if totally unemployed and eligible. As used in For purposes
of this section, “wages” in any one week includes only that amount of
remuneration earned by the individual in employment, rounded to the nearest
dollar that is in excess of 50 percent of the individual’s weekly wage wages in
employment.
* * *
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 1343 is amended to read:
§ 1343. CONDITIONS
* * *
(c) Benefits are payable on the basis of service in employment as defined in
subdivisions 1301(6)(A)(ix) and (x) of this subchapter, in the same amount, on
the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the
basis of other service subject to this chapter, except that:
(1) With respect to services performed in an instructional, research, or
principal administrative capacity for an educational institution, benefits shall
not be payable on the basis of such the services for any week of unemployment
commencing during the period between two successive academic years or
terms (or, when an agreement provides instead for a similar period between
two regular but not successive terms, during such period) or during a period of
paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual’s contract, to any
individual if the individual performs such the services in the first of the
VT LEG #380116 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.235
2025 Page 3 of 4
academic years or terms and if there is a contract or reasonable assurance that
the individual will perform services in any such capacity for any educational
institution in the second of the academic years or terms.
(2) With respect to services performed in any other capacity for an
educational institution, benefits shall not be payable on the basis of such
services to any individual for any week of unemployment that commences
during a period between two successive academic years or terms if the
individual performs such services in the first of the academic years or terms
and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform such
services for any educational institution in the second of the academic years or
terms, except that if benefits are denied to any individual under this
subdivision and the individual was not offered an opportunity to perform such
services for the educational institution for the second of the academic years or
terms, the individual shall be entitled to a retroactive payment of the benefits
for each week for which the individual filed a timely claim for benefits and for
which benefits were denied solely by reason of this subdivision. [Repealed.]
(3) With respect to any services described in subdivision (1) or (2) of
this subsection, benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services in any
such capacities to any individual for any week that commences during an
established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if the individual
performs such the services in the period immediately before the vacation
VT LEG #380116 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.235
2025 Page 4 of 4
period or holiday recess, and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual
will perform such the services in the period immediately following the
vacation period or holiday recess.
(4) With respect to any services described in subdivision (1) or (2) of
this subsection, benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services in any
such capacities as specified in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this subsection
to any individual who performed such the services in an educational institution
while in the employ of an educational service agency. As used in this
subdivision, the term “educational service agency” means a governmental
agency or governmental entity that is established and operated exclusively for
the purpose of providing such services to one or more educational institutions.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380116 v.1